Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1413
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means the direct oversight or the easy availability of the supervising funeral director and embalmer. The first twenty-five funeral assists and embalmings performed by an apprentice shall be completed under direct onsite supervision of the supervising funeral director and embalmer.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 549;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 5.